Maryland, session 2026, HB0314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
SUBTITLE 18. AUTOMATION TECHNOLOGY DEPLOYMENT ASSESSMENT.
11–1801.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0314*

HOUSE BILL 314
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTOMATION TECHNOLOGY” MEANS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE,
MACHINE LEARNING SYSTEMS, ROBOTICS, OR OTHER ADVANCED TECHNOLOGIES
IMPLEMENTED WITH THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OR SUBSTANTIAL EFFECT OF
REPLACING HUMAN LABOR.
(C) “COVERED EMPLOYER” MEANS AN EMPLOYER THAT, DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR:
(1) EMPLOYED 100 OR MORE EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE; AND
(2) REDUCED ITS WORKFORCE IN THE STATE BY AT LEAST 10
EMPLOYEES WHILE DEPLOYING OR USING AUTOMATION TECHNOLOGY THAT
CONTRIBUTED TO THE REDUCTION.
(D) “DISPLACED EMPLOYEE” MEANS A FORMER EMPLOYEE OF A COVERED
EMPLOYER IN THE STATE WHO WAS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT DUE TO THE
DEPLOYMENT OR USE OF AUTOMATION TECHNOLOGY BY THE COVERED EMPLOYER.
(E) “EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED FULL–TIME OR
PART–TIME DIRECTLY BY AN EMPLOYER.
(F) “EMPLOYER” MEANS A PERSON WHO EMPLOYS AT LEAST ONE
INDIVIDUAL IN THE STATE.
(G) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF LABOR.
11–1802.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 15 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, EACH
COVERED EMPLOYER SHALL SUBMIT ON A FORM AND IN A MANNER APPROVED BY
THE SECRETARY:
(1) THE NUMBER OF EMPLOYEES OF THE COVERED EMPLOYER IN THE
STATE ON THE FIRST AND LAST DAYS OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING PREVIOUS
CALENDAR YEAR;
(2) A DESCRIPTION OF AUTOMATION TECHNOLOGIES DEPLOYED OR
USED BY THE COVERED EMPLOYER DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR; AND

HOUSE BILL 314 3
(3) THE NUMBER OF DISPLACED EMPLOYEES DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, EXCLUDING INDIVIDUALS SEPARATED
FROM EMPLOYMENT DUE TO:
(I) VOLUNTARY ATTRITION OR RETIREMENT;
(II) A DECLINE IN REVENUE EXCEEDING 20% THAT WAS NOT
RELATED TO THE DEPLOYMENT OR USE OF AUTOMATED TECHNOLOGY; OR
(III) THE CLOSURE OR RELOCATION OF AN ENTIRE FACILITY IN
THE STATE.
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT SPECIFY THE
INFORMATION THAT A COVERED EMPLOYER IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE INCLUDED IN A REPORT:
(1) SIGNED BY THE PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER OR AN
INDIVIDUAL PERFORMING A SIMILAR FUNCTION; AND
(2) THAT INCLUDES AN AFFIDAVIT UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY
THAT THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) WAS REVIEWED BY THE SIGNING OFFICER; AND
(II) IS TRUE TO THE BEST OF THE SIGNING OFFICER’S
KNOWLEDGE, INFORMATION, AND BELIEF.
11–1803.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A COVERED EMPLOYER SHALL PAY TO THE
SECRETARY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO $900 FOR EACH DISPLACED EMPLOYEE
REPORTED UNDER § 11–1802(A)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL ANNUALLY ADJUST THE AMOUNT
ASSESSED FOR EACH DISPLACED EMPLOYEE BY INFLATION, ROUNDED TO THE
NEAREST WHOLE DOLLAR, BASED ON AN APPROPRIATE INDEX SPECIFIED BY THE
SECRETARY IN REGULATION.

HOUSE BILL 314
(B) A COVERED EMPLOYER MAY REDUCE THE PAYMENT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION BY 50% WITH RESPECT TO A DISPLACED
EMPLOYEE FOR WHOM THE EMPLOYER:
(1) PROVIDED AT LEAST 12 WEEKS OF SEVERANCE PAY;
(2) OFFERED CERTIFIED RETRAINING OR REDEPLOYMENT
OPPORTUNITIES; OR
(3) SUCCESSFULLY PLACED WITH ANOTHER EMPLOYER WHOSE
PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS IS LOCATED IN THE STATE AND THAT, DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, EMPLOYED FEWER THAN 50
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE.
(C) A COVERED EMPLOYER SHALL MAKE THE PAYMENT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE SECRETARY WITH THE SUBMISSION OF
THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER § 11–1802 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL REMIT AMOUNTS PAID IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION TO THE DISPLACED EMPLOYEE RETRAINING FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 11–1805 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
11–1804.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL ASSESS A CIVIL PENALTY OF $250 AGAINST A
COVERED EMPLOYER FOR EACH DAY THE COVERED EMPLOYER FAILS TO TIMELY
FILE A REPORT UNDER § 11–1802 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL ASSESS A CIVIL PENALTY OF $250,000 AGAINST
A COVERED EMPLOYER THAT FAILS TO MAKE THE PAYMENT REQUIRED UNDER §
11–1803 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
11–1805.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE DISPLACED EMPLOYEE
RETRAINING FUND.
(B) THERE IS A DISPLACED EMPLOYEE RETRAINING FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT THE RETRAINING OF
INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE BEEN SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT DUE TO THE
DEPLOYMENT OR USE OF AUTOMATION TECHNOLOGY.

HOUSE BILL 314 5
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 11–1803 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR SUPPORTING TRAINING, JOB
PLACEMENT, AND SERVICE PROGRAMS UNDER THIS TITLE.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR SUPPORTING TRAINING, JOB
PLACEMENT, AND SERVICE PROGRAMS UNDER THIS TITLE IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO
AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD
BE APPROPRIATED FOR TRAINING, JOB PLACEMENT, AND SERVICE PROGRAMS
UNDER THIS TITLE.
11–1806.
ON OR BEFORE MARCH 15 EACH YEAR, THE SECRETARY SHALL REPORT TO
THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:

HOUSE BILL 314
(1) THE NUMBER OF EMPLOYERS THAT, DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, EMPLOYED AT LEAST 100 EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE;
(2) THE NUMBER OF COVERED EMPLOYERS DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
(3) THE NUMBER OF DISPLACED EMPLOYEES REPORTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–1802 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
(4) THE TOTAL AMOUNTS PAID IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–1803 OF
THIS SUBTITLE DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR; AND
(5) ANY POLICY RECOMMENDATIONS TO SUPPORT DISPLACED
EMPLOYEES.
11–1807.
THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, BASED ON THE INFORMATION REPORTED
UNDER § 11–1802(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) VERIFY WHICH EMPLOYERS HAVE 100 OR MORE
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE; AND
(II) ENSURE THAT ALL EMPLOYERS WITH 100 OR MORE
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE HAVE MADE THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 11–1802
OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.